Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Chapter 41. Offenses Against the Person.

Cross references. —

For provisions authorizing arrest without warrant in certain cases where the police officer has reasonable cause to believe that the person has committed a crime under this chapter, see
AS

12.25.030(b)

.

For increase in classification of misdemeanors committed in connection with a criminal street gang, see AS

12.55.137

.

For provisions on insanity and competency to stand trial, see
AS 12.47.

For provisions relating to punishment, see AS

12.55.125

for imprisonment for felonies, AS

12.55.135

for imprisonment for misdemeanors, and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For restitution, see AS

12.55.045

.